Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1937
Licensee; discrimination or retaliation
prohibited; cause of action for relief.

Licensees shall not discriminate or retaliate
against an individual or the family of an individual residing in, served by,
or employed at the residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency
who has initiated or participated in any proceeding authorized by the Children's
Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act or who has presented a complaint
or provided information to the administrator of the residential child-caring
agency or child-placing agency or the department. Such individual may maintain
an action for any type of relief, including injunctive and declaratory relief,
permitted by law.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 14.